Colorado, session 2026A, SB106.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the "Save
Money and Resources Through (SMART) Ballot Options Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Under current law, every active registered elector
automatically receives a mail ballot for each election conducted under the
"Uniform Election Code of 1992";
(b) Many electors consistently vote in person at voter service and
polling centers and do not use their automatically mailed ballot packets;
(c) Counties incur significant costs by printing, assembling, and
mailing unused ballot packets, including postage, materials, and vendor
handling costs, which continue to rise annually due to increasing voter
registration totals and increasing United States postal service rates;
-2- SB26-106

(d) Allowing voters to voluntarily opt out of automatic mail ballot
delivery respects individual voter preference while preserving all existing
voting access options;
(e) Allowing voluntary opt-out of mail ballot delivery reduces
ballot waste, reduces undeliverable mail, enhances operational efficiency,
and reduces both county and state costs, as section 1-5-505.5 requires the
state to reimburse 45% of county election costs for state-certified
elections; and
(f) A voter-initiated opt-out of automatic mail ballot delivery must
remain voluntary, transparent, reversible, and accessible, with no
reduction in voting access or services available at voter service and
polling centers.
(2) The general assembly further finds and declares that it is in the
public interest to allow electors to voluntarily opt out of automatic mail
ballot delivery while maintaining in-person access to voting and
safeguarding the ability to request a mail ballot at any time.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 1-7.5-104.3 as
follows:
1-7.5-104.3 Mail ballot elections - opt-out of mail ballot
delivery.
(1) USING THE PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY THE SECRETARY OF
STATE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION, A REGISTERED
ELECTOR MAY CHOOSE NOT TO RECEIVE A MAIL BALLOT PACKET FOR ALL
ELECTIONS THAT THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER CONDUCTS BY MAIL
BALLOT PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 7.5.
(2) BY MARCH 1, 2027, THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL ADOPT
RULES IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE 4 OF TITLE 24 THAT ESTABLISH A
-3- SB26-106

PROCESS BY WHICH A REGISTERED ELECTOR MAY CHOOSE, FOR ANY
ELECTION CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO THIS CODE ON OR AFTER NOVEMBER
2, 2027, NOT TO RECEIVE A MAIL BALLOT PACKET FOR ALL ELECTIONS
THAT THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER CONDUCTS BY MAIL PURSUANT
TO THIS ARTICLE 7.5. THE RULES MUST INCLUDE:
(a) A PROCESS BY WHICH A REGISTERED ELECTOR MAY CHOOSE
NOT TO RECEIVE A MAIL BALLOT PACKET FOR ALL ELECTIONS THAT THE
COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER CONDUCTS BY MAIL, INCLUDING OPTIONS
TO MAKE SUCH CHOICE ONLINE, IN PERSON, OR BY A PAPER FORM THAT
MAY BE DELIVERED BY MAIL OR ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION;
(b) A PROCESS BY WHICH A REGISTERED ELECTOR MAY CHOOSE TO
RESUME RECEIPT OF A MAIL BALLOT PACKET FOR ALL ELECTIONS THAT THE
COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER CONDUCTS BY MAIL AFTER OPTING OUT OF
SUCH RECEIPT, INCLUDING OPTIONS TO MAKE SUCH CHOICE ONLINE, IN
PERSON, OR BY A PAPER FORM THAT MAY BE DELIVERED BY MAIL OR
ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION;
(c) A DURABLE INDICATOR IN THE STATEWIDE VOTER
REGISTRATION SYSTEM THAT A REGISTERED ELECTOR HAS CHOSEN NOT TO
RECEIVE OR TO RESUME RECEIPT OF A MAIL BALLOT PACKET FOR ALL
ELECTIONS THAT THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER CONDUCTS BY MAIL;
(d) THE TIMING AND DEADLINES FOR A COUNTY CLERK AND
RECORDER TO UPDATE THE COUNTY'S BALLOT-PRINTING SUPPRESSION
FILES WHEN A REGISTERED ELECTOR HAS CHOSEN NOT TO RECEIVE A MAIL
BALLOT PACKET PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION OR HAS
CHOSEN TO RESUME RECEIPT OF A MAIL BALLOT PACKET, AFTER OPTING
OUT OF SUCH RECEIPT, PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(b) OF THIS SECTION;
AND
-4- SB26-106

(e) THE TIMING AND DEADLINES FOR A REGISTERED ELECTOR TO
CHOOSE NOT TO RECEIVE A MAIL BALLOT PACKET PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION OR TO CHOOSE TO RESUME RECEIPT OF
A MAIL BALLOT PACKET, AFTER OPTING OUT OF SUCH RECEIPT, PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (2)(b) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL DEVELOP PUBLIC-FACING
COMMUNICATIONS TO EXPLAIN THE VOLUNTARY NATURE OF CHOOSING
NOT TO RECEIVE A MAIL BALLOT PACKET FOR ALL ELECTIONS THAT THE
COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER CONDUCTS BY MAIL PURSUANT TO THIS
ARTICLE 7.5.
(4) A REGISTERED ELECTOR WHO HAS CHOSEN NOT TO RECEIVE A
MAIL BALLOT PACKET FOR ALL ELECTIONS THAT THE COUNTY CLERK AND
RECORDER CONDUCTS BY MAIL PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 7.5 MAY
REQUEST A MAIL BALLOT FOR ANY ELECTION PURSUANT TO SECTION
1-7.5-114.7.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-7.5-107, amend
(3)(a)(I) as follows:
1-7.5-107. Procedures for conducting mail ballot election -
primary elections - first-time voters casting a mail ballot after having
registered by mail to vote - in-person request for ballot - return
envelope requirements.
(3) (a) (I) (A) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION
(3)(a)(I)(B) OF THIS SECTION, not sooner than twenty-two days before a
general, primary, or other mail ballot election, and no later than eighteen
days before the election, the county clerk and recorder or designated
election official shall mail to each active registered elector, at the last
mailing address appearing in the registration records and in accordance
-5- SB26-106

with United States postal service regulations, a mail ballot packet, which
must be marked "DO NOT FORWARD. ADDRESS CORRECTION
REQUESTED.", or any other similar statement that is in accordance with
United States postal service regulations. Nothing in this subsection (3)
affects any provision of this code governing the delivery of mail ballots
to an absent uniformed services elector, nonresident overseas elector, or
resident overseas elector covered by the federal "Uniformed and Overseas
Citizens Absentee Voting Act", 52 U.S.C. sec. 20301 et seq.
(B) THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER OR DESIGNATED ELECTION
OFFICIAL SHALL NOT MAIL A MAIL BALLOT PACKET TO ANY REGISTERED
ELECTOR WHO HAS CHOSEN, USING THE PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY THE
SECRETARY OF STATE PURSUANT TO SECTION 1-7.5-104.3 (2), NOT TO
RECEIVE A MAIL BALLOT PACKET FOR ALL ELECTIONS THAT THE COUNTY
CLERK AND RECORDER CONDUCTS BY MAIL PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE
7.5. AN ELECTOR WHO CHOOSES NOT TO RECEIVE A MAIL BALLOT PACKET
RETAINS THE RIGHT TO VOTE IN PERSON AT ANY VOTER SERVICE AND
POLLING CENTER AND TO REQUEST A MAIL BALLOT FOR ANY ELECTION
PURSUANT TO SECTION 1-7.5-114.7.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 1-7.5-114.7 as
follows:
1-7.5-114.7. Mail ballots for electors after opting out of mail
ballots.
A REGISTERED ELECTOR WHO HAS CHOSEN, USING THE PROCESS
ESTABLISHED BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE PURSUANT TO SECTION
1-7.5-104.3 (2), NOT TO RECEIVE A MAIL BALLOT PACKET FOR ALL
ELECTIONS THAT THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER CONDUCTS BY MAIL
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 7.5 MAY OBTAIN A MAIL BALLOT BY MAIL FOR
-6- SB26-106

ANY ELECTION. TO OBTAIN A MAIL BALLOT BY MAIL, THE ELECTOR MUST
MAKE A REQUEST TO THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER FOR A MAIL
BALLOT NO LATER THAN THE EIGHTH DAY BEFORE AN ELECTION. THE
COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER SHALL ENSURE THAT THE STATEWIDE
VOTER REGISTRATION SYSTEM IS UPDATED TO REFLECT THAT THE
REGISTERED ELECTOR REQUESTED A MAIL BALLOT BY MAIL AND THAT THE
COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER MAILED A MAIL BALLOT TO THE
REGISTERED ELECTOR WHO MADE THE REQUEST.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-5-102.9, add (7)
as follows:
1-5-102.9. Voter service and polling centers - number required
- services provided - drop-off locations - definition.
(7) A REGISTERED ELECTOR WHO HAS CHOSEN NOT TO RECEIVE A
MAIL BALLOT PACKET FOR ALL ELECTIONS USING THE PROCESS
ESTABLISHED BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE PURSUANT TO SECTION
1-7.5-104.3 (2) MUST VOTE IN PERSON AT A VOTER SERVICE AND POLLING
CENTER OR REQUEST A MAIL BALLOT PURSUANT TO SECTION 1-7.5-114.7.
ALL VOTER SERVICE AND POLLING CENTER SERVICES, INCLUDING
REGISTRATION UPDATES, BALLOT REPLACEMENT, AND ACCESSIBLE VOTING
SERVICES, ARE AVAILABLE TO ACTIVE REGISTERED ELECTORS WHO HAVE
CHOSEN NOT TO RECEIVE A MAIL BALLOT PACKET.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-5-505.5, add (3)
as follows:
1-5-505.5. State reimbursement to counties for elections with
state certified ballot content - reporting.
(3) (a) FOR EACH GENERAL, PRIMARY, ODD-YEAR, COORDINATED,
RECALL, AND CONGRESSIONAL VACANCY ELECTION THAT IS CONDUCTED
-7- SB26-106

ON OR AFTER NOVEMBER 2, 2027, AND THAT THE COUNTY CLERK AND
RECORDER CONDUCTS BY MAIL PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 7.5 OF THIS TITLE
1, EACH COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER SHALL REPORT TO THE SECRETARY
OF STATE THE NUMBER OF REGISTERED ELECTORS IN THE COUNTY WHO
CHOSE, USING THE PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE
PURSUANT TO SECTION 1-7.5-104.3 (2), NOT TO RECEIVE A MAIL BALLOT
PACKET FOR THE ELECTION AND THE NUMBER OF MAIL BALLOT PACKETS
THAT THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER DID NOT MAIL FOR THAT
ELECTION AS A RESULT OF SUCH ELECTORS CHOOSING NOT TO RECEIVE A
MAIL BALLOT PACKET. EACH COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER SHALL
REPORT THE INFORMATION REQUIRED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3)(a) IN A FORM
AND MANNER DETERMINED BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE.
(b) THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL USE THE INFORMATION
REPORTED BY COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDERS PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(3)(a) OF THIS SECTION TO DOCUMENT REDUCTIONS IN THE COSTS THAT
THE COUNTY INCURRED IN CONDUCTING THE ELECTION AND THAT THE
STATE REIMBURSES PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL MAKE THE INFORMATION
REPORTED AND DOCUMENTED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3)
AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC ON THE SECRETARY OF STATE'S WEBSITE.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-5-907, amend (4)
as follows:
1-5-907. In-person minority language ballot - county clerk -
voter service and polling centers.
(4) The county clerk shall notify all electors via the mail ballot
packet and in each language in which the in-person minority language
ballot option will be available that electors may request an in-person
-8- SB26-106

minority language ballot in the applicable language at any voter service
and polling center in the county.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-12-114, amend
(2)(b) as follows:
1-12-114. Mail ballots - plan required - voter service and
polling centers - number required - definition.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of this code:
(b) Not earlier than the twenty-second day or later than the
eighteenth day before the election, the designated election official shall
mail ballots to all active registered electors; EXCEPT THAT THE
DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL SHALL NOT MAIL BALLOTS TO ACTIVE
REGISTERED ELECTORS WHO HAVE CHOSEN NOT TO RECEIVE A MAIL
BALLOT PACKET PURSUANT TO SECTION 1-7.5-104.3.
SECTION 10. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-9- SB26-106